Mississippi, session 2026, SB2643.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The segment of Mississippi Highway 550 located in Lincoln County, Mississippi, commencing at its intersection with Caseyville Road and extending west approximately one (1) mile, is designated and shall be known as the "Lamar Smith Memorial Highway." (2)  The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and shall stand repealed on June 30, 2026.